Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.50.902

Effective date—1993 c 128.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 26, 1993].

[ 1993 c 128 s 14.]